Washington statutes.
RCW 36.49.030

Application for license after assessor's list returned.

Any person becoming the owner of a dog or kennel after the assessment has been returned by the assessor and any owner of a dog or kennel which for any reason the assessor has failed to assess, may at any time apply to the county treasurer, and upon the payment of the required fee procure a license and a metallic tag or tags.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.49.030. Prior: 1929 c 198 s 3, part; RRS s 8304-3, part.]